Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 2. Appeals

§ 36-2-201.
Questions may be reserved to district court.

Whenever an important or difficult matter of law or fact is to be decided in a contest or other proceeding pending before the board of land commissioners, or whenever in the judgment of the members of said board any of its members are for any reason disqualified from considering and deciding the questions or issues involved in any contest or other proceeding before such board, then and in that event, the board of land commissioners may on the motion of either party interested, or upon its own motion, cause the said contest or other proceeding to be reserved and sent to the district court for the county in which the land in controversy is situated.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 68, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 651; Laws 1919, ch. 131, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 748; R.S. 1931, § 91-301; C.S. 1945, § 24-301; W.S. 1957, § 36-22.

Law reviews. —

For note, “De Novo Judicial Review of Wyoming Administrative Findings,” see 15 Wyo. L.J. 67 (1960).

§ 36-2-202.
Certified copies of papers to be sent to court; docket fee.

When a contest or other proceeding is reserved and ordered sent to a district court, the director shall transmit certified copies of all the papers in the case in his possession and in his office to the clerk of the said district court and the board of land commissioners shall determine who shall pay the docket fee in the district court.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 68, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 652; Laws 1919, ch. 131, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 749; R.S. 1931, § 91-302; C.S. 1945, § 24-302; W.S. 1957, § 36-23; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

§ 36-2-203.
When issues made up before removal.

If the issues in said reserved contest or proceeding have been made up before the same shall have been removed, then in that case the said contest or proceeding when so removed shall be deemed ready for hearing; provided, however, that the judge of said district court may grant amendments to the pleadings already filed.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 68, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 653; C.S. 1920, § 750; R.S. 1931, § 91-303; C.S. 1945, § 24-303; W.S. 1957, § 36-24.

Cross references. —

As to amended and supplemental pleadings, see Rule 15, W.R.C.P.

§ 36-2-204.
When issues not made up before removal.

If the issues in said contest or proceeding have not been made up at the time the same is so removed to the district court then in that case the date when said contest or proceeding is filed in said district court shall be deemed the date of the filing of the petition of the contestant, and all of the proceedings thereafter shall be in accordance with the rules governing the trial of civil cases, including the making up of the issue, the trial of the case and an appeal from the judgment of the district court.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 68, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 654; C.S. 1920, § 751; R.S. 1931, § 91-304; C.S. 1945, § 24-304; W.S. 1957, § 36-25.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, see Wyoming Court Rules.

§ 36-2-205.
Determination, certification, recordation and effect.

When such case is reserved to the district court the same shall be tried and determined by such court, and its findings and judgments thereon shall be certified by the clerk of said court, to the director and he shall record the same in the record of the proceedings of the board of land commissioners, and when so recorded, such findings and judgments shall have the same force and effect as though rendered by said board.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 68, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 655; Laws 1919, ch. 131, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 752; R.S. 1931, § 91-305; C.S. 1945, § 24-305; W.S. 1957, § 36-26; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Cited

in

Spaugh v. Ross, 37 Wyo. 396, 263 P. 613,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1928).

§ 36-2-206.
Appeals to district court.

Any party who may feel himself aggrieved by the decision of the board of land commissioners rendered in any contest proceeding held before said board, may have an appeal from such decision to the district court sitting within and for the county in which the land in controversy is situated. All persons joining in the appeal shall be joined as appellants, and all persons having interests adverse to the parties appealing, or any of them, shall be joined as appellees; and upon said appeal being perfected, said contest proceeding shall stand to be heard and for trial de novo, by said court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 86, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 843; C.S. 1910, § 656; Laws 1919, ch. 131, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 753; R.S. 1931, § 91-306; C.S. 1945, § 24-306; W.S. 1957, § 36-27.

Cross references. —

As to appeal by persons aggrieved by decisions of oil and gas conservation commission, see §

30-5-113

.

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

When board decision deemed rendered. —

In the normal course of events, a decision of the board is not rendered until the mailing of the notice of the decision to the parties. Rayburne v. Queen, 76 Wyo. 393, 303 P.2d 486,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1956).

Requirements for binding decision. —

Any decision of the board, in order to be binding upon a party, must be made either: (1) unequivocally in the parties' presence; or (2) by a written record of the board's decision which is actually available to the public. Rayburne v. Queen, 76 Wyo. 393, 303 P.2d 486,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1956).

Mandamus precluded. —

Where applicant for mineral lease had adequate remedy by appeal from contest proceeding, mandamus against board would not lie. State ex rel. Walls v. State Bd. of Land Comm'rs, 36 Wyo. 302, 254 P. 491,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1927).

Who may appeal. —

Appeal from rejection by board for application for mineral lease was not limited to persons having vested right to lease. Walls v. Evans, 38 Wyo. 103, 265 P. 29,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1928).

When appeal not warranted. —

Denial by board of mineral lease to land does not involve contest proceedings warranting appeal to district court, where court had theretofore ordered lease issued to another. State ex rel. Walls v. District Court, 38 Wyo. 427, 267 P. 1060,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1928).

District court jurisdiction. —

The district court is limited to questions that were, or might have been, raised before the board and may not enlarge the proceedings into an equitable or common-law action, although its judgment is not review upon error, but is based upon its own findings on the evidence. Bucknum v. Johnson, 21 Wyo. 26, 127 P. 904,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1912).

Appeal under this section being purely statutory, district court had no jurisdiction unless appeal came within the provisions of statute. State ex rel. Walls v. District Court, 38 Wyo. 427, 267 P. 1060,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1928).

Perfecting appeal. —

Appeal is not perfected until proper notice has been given, and the abstract of record, while it should be concise, should be sufficiently complete to enable court to determine merits of the case. Wyodak Chem. Co. v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 51 Wyo. 265, 65 P.2d 1103,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1937).

Presumption as to ground of trial court's dismissal of appeal.—

Where the trial court dismissed appeal from board pursuant to a motion by appellee, limited to single ground that appeal was not filed within 30 days after board's decision, the supreme court would not presume that the dismissal was based on the ground that a proper certificate was not attached. Rayburne v. Queen, 76 Wyo. 393, 303 P.2d 486,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1956).

Written notice of board's decision is not required

to be given to parties. Rayburne v. Queen, 76 Wyo. 393, 303 P.2d 486,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1956).

Testimony before board should be preserved verbatim for court.—

The testimony before the board in contested cases should be preserved verbatim and be available to the district court in the trial de novo as one of the bases for its judgment. Rayburne v. Queen, 78 Wyo. 359, 326 P.2d 1108,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1958).

Meaning of “trial de novo.” —

The court from the facts before it should determine whether or not the board might reasonably have arrived at its decision. Rayburne v. Queen, 78 Wyo. 359, 326 P.2d 1108,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1958).

Trial de novo mentioned in this section is limited to determination by district court whether on facts proved there was “an illegal exercise” of board's discretion, fraud or “grave abuse of such discretion.” Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Trial “de novo,” as mentioned in section, is limited to a determination on the part of the district court as to whether on the facts proven there was “an illegal exercise” of the board's discretion, a case of fraud or a “grave abuse of discretion.” Howard v. Lindmier, 67 Wyo. 78, 214 P.2d 737,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1950); L. L. Sheep Co. v. Potter, 67 Wyo. 348, 224 P.2d 496,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1950).

Court may not enlarge issues before board. —

Although a district court in deciding an appeal under this section is entitled to determine whether the decision of the board was illegal, fraudulent or a grave abuse of discretion, and in so doing is not confined to the facts actually or assumedly presented to the board but may conduct an independent inquiry, it may not enlarge the issues before the board. In re Hagood, 356 P.2d 135,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1960).

Findings of board, if supported by substantial evidence, shouldbe approved. —

The findings of the board if supported by substantial evidence should be approved by the court on the trial de novo. Such substantial evidence may consist of competent testimony either: (1) taken before the board and properly preserved; or (2) adduced in the trial before the court “as in the trial of a civil action.” Rayburne v. Queen, 78 Wyo. 359, 326 P.2d 1108,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1958).

Unless fraud, illegal action or abuse of discretion shown.—

The evidence developed in the trial de novo before the district court in general supported the decision of the board. No fraud being charged and no illegal action or abuse of discretion having been shown, the board's determination should not be disturbed. Rayburne v. Queen, 78 Wyo. 359, 326 P.2d 1108,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1958).

Discretion of board is such that except in case of fraud or grave abuse resulting in manifest injustice, courts probably will not, in ordinary cases of renewal of leases, feel warranted in interfering with its exercise. Cooper v. McCormick, 10 Wyo. 379, 69 P. 301,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1902).

In leasing state lands, board exercises wide discretion which should be controlling except in case of illegal exercise thereof, or fraud or grave abuse of such discretion. Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Discretion of board not eliminated on appeal. —

Trial before district court is de novo and judgment of trial court cannot be entirely ignored as to facts which first appeared there, but discretion of board is not thereby wiped out on appeal and that of trial judge substituted. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Discretion of land board in leasing land is controlling on appeal, in absence of illegality, fraud or abuse, notwithstanding provision for trial de novo. Miller v. Hurley, 37 Wyo. 344, 262 P. 238,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1927).

Court must determine that board abused its discretion. —

Even if the district court comes to a different conclusion than that of the board, considering the evidence as a whole, that is in no sense conclusive. The court must go further. It must be able to determine that the board might not reasonably, under the same state of facts, have come to a different conclusion; in other words that the board abused its discretion. Howard v. Lindmier, 67 Wyo. 78, 214 P.2d 737,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1950).

Weight and credibility given witnesses by board not to be disregarded.—

Since the board in the first instance as trier of the facts sees and hears the witnesses, the weight and credibility given the witnesses by the board should not be lightly disregarded. Under such circumstances the action of the board, which has the constitutional power to lease or decline to lease state lands, should ordinarily be upheld by the district court. L. L. Sheep Co. v. Potter, 67 Wyo. 348, 224 P.2d 496,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1950).

Evidence required to overrule board. —

The district court, in order to overrule the board, must have evidence before it to show that the conclusion of the board was wrong and unreasonable. Howard v. Lindmier, 67 Wyo. 78, 214 P.2d 737,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1950).

Ultimate fact to be found by district court

in case where board preferred new applicant to old lessee is as to whether or not the board abused its discretion, and there must be satisfactory evidence to show that the board abused its discretion in order to comply with the rule that the decision of the board should not be lightly overturned. Howard v. Lindmier, 67 Wyo. 78, 214 P.2d 737,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1950).

When board action must be affirmed. —

Where board in exercising its discretionary power leased state lands to qualified corporation holding expired lease and neither exercised its discretion illegally, nor gravely abused it, and no fraud is proven, board action must be affirmed. Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

No reversal of board on point on which party changes position.—

It would not be fair to the board to have its decision reversed on a point on which a party takes a position in the trial of the case before the district court exactly opposite to that which he took before the board. Howard v. Lindmier, 67 Wyo. 78, 214 P.2d 737,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1950).

Award based on conflicting evidence. —

There was no “grave abuse” of discretion by the board in awarding 137.3 acres to individual applicant and the balance of the tract of 621.28 acres of grazing land to a sheep company where the evidence was in conflict as to the necessary use of the land. L. L. Sheep Co. v. Potter, 67 Wyo. 348, 224 P.2d 496,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1950).

Conversion of grazing land into hay or meadow land valid consideration.—

The board has the right, if not the duty, to cause the conversion of state land from grazing land into hay or meadow land, since the latter land brings an increased rental price. Even the possibility of such a conversion is within the range of facts to be considered by the board. The board did not abuse its discretion in leasing state land to new applicant in preference to old lessee where only the new applicant was willing to convert grazing land into hay and meadow land. Howard v. Lindmier, 67 Wyo. 78, 214 P.2d 737,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1950).

Finding warranting lease preference sustained. —

Evidence showing that to deprive applicant for renewal of state land leases of land included therein, which its owners had held many years, would depreciate remaining property and inflict severe hardships sustained finding warranting lease to him in preference to others. Hawks v. Creswell, 60 Wyo. 1, 144 P.2d 129,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1943).

Leasehold owner. —

Where title to state land leases passed to stepson and his nephews under residuary clause of stepmother's will, stepson with nephews' consent continuing to operate same, and where value thereof was not needed to pay estate debts, stepson was holder of expiring leases, notwithstanding failure of administratrix's final report and order discharging her to mention them. Hawks v. Creswell, 60 Wyo. 1, 144 P.2d 129,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1943).

Cited

in

Spaugh v. Ross, 37 Wyo. 396, 263 P. 613,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1928); Walls v. Evans, 38 Wyo. 103, 265 P. 29,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1928); Brown v. Wintermute, 59 Wyo. 254, 139 P.2d 435,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1943); Hoy v. Frederick, 70 Wyo. 496, 252 P.2d 112,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1953).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
62.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-2-207.
Written notice of intent to appeal; bond.

The party appealing shall, within thirty (30) days after receiving notice by registered mail of the decision of the board, file with the director, a notice in writing to the board of land commissioners stating that such party intends to appeal to said district court from said decision; and at the same time shall file a like notice in the said district court; and upon the filing of said notices, the appeal shall be deemed to have been taken; provided, however, that the party appealing shall within fifteen (15) days after the said notices have been filed, enter into an undertaking to be approved by the clerk or the judge of the said district court and to be given to the appellees, and to be in such an amount as said court or the judge thereof shall fix, but in any case, shall not be less than five hundred dollars ($500.00), and conditioned that the appellant shall prosecute his appeal without unnecessary delay and will pay all costs and damages which the appellees or any of them may sustain in consequence of such appeal.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 86, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 844; C.S. 1910, § 657; Laws 1919, ch. 131, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 754; R.S. 1931, § 91-307; C.S. 1945, § 24-307; Laws 1957, ch. 65, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-28; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Strict compliance with requirements of section must be made

in order to confer jurisdiction of the appeal on the district court. Ginn v. Parrish, 362 P.2d 824,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1961).

Perfecting appeal. —

Appeal is not perfected until proper notice has been given. Wyodak Chem. Co. v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 51 Wyo. 265, 65 P.2d 1103,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1937).

Appeal from board held timely

where notice of appeal was delivered to clerk within time allowed, though marked “filed” as of later date. Walls v. Evans, 38 Wyo. 103, 265 P. 29,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1928).

Appeal by old lessee of school land, taken within 30 days after land commissioners affirmed prior order granting another's application for lease, was timely where prior order had been made without notice to old lessee. Mercer v. Thorley, 48 Wyo. 141, 43 P.2d 692,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

Spaugh v. Ross, 37 Wyo. 396, 263 P. 613,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1928).

§ 36-2-208.
Transmission of evidence to district court; hearing on appeal.

Upon notice of intention to appeal having been filed with the director, he shall at once transmit to the clerk of the district court to which such appeal has been taken, a certified copy of all papers and documents in evidence in the case together with a transcript of all orders and journal entries concerning the same and a certified copy of the decision appealed from. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, said appeal shall be heard upon the pleadings filed before the board of land commissioners and at the trial of such appeal, evidence shall be taken and other proceedings had as in the trial of a civil action before said court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 86, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 845; C.S. 1910, § 658; Laws 1919, ch. 131, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 755; R.S. 1931, § 91-308; C.S. 1945, § 24-308; W.S. 1957, § 36-29; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Records which should be kept by board. —

In view of the fact that the legislature has provided for an appeal from the board to the courts, except perhaps insofar as the record of the land commissioner (now director) already shows the facts, the board should keep records in accordance with its dignity and importance, letting them show in contested cases at least a summary of the facts and circumstances shown before it and in accordance with which it acted and the reasons for its action. Howard v. Lindmier, 67 Wyo. 78, 214 P.2d 737,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1950).

Legislature intended board to require pleadings

by those appearing before it. In re Hagood, 356 P.2d 135,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1960).

Testimony before board should be preserved verbatim for districtcourt. —

The testimony before the board in contested cases should be preserved verbatim and be available to the court in the trial de novo as one of the bases for its judgment. Rayburne v. Queen, 78 Wyo. 359, 326 P.2d 1108,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1958).

Under section appellant is entitled to assume that record he has filed is sufficient

until objection is made thereto. Rayburne v. Queen, 76 Wyo. 393, 303 P.2d 486,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1956).

Court is, in a sense, substituted for board

to determine the matter in issue upon the facts. The question to be determined by the court is the same as that which was presented to the board. Bucknum v. Johnson, 21 Wyo. 26, 127 P. 904,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1912).

Findings of board, if supported by substantial evidence, shouldbe approved by court. —

The findings of the board if supported by substantial evidence should be approved by the court on the trial de novo. Such substantial evidence may consist of competent testimony either: (1) taken before the board and properly preserved; or (2) adduced in the trial before the court “as in the trial of a civil action.” Rayburne v. Queen, 78 Wyo. 359, 326 P.2d 1108,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1958).

Unless fraud, illegal action or abuse of discretion shown.—

The evidence developed in the trial de novo before the district court in general supported the decision of the board. No fraud being charged and no illegal action or abuse of discretion having been shown, the board's determination should not be disturbed. Rayburne v. Queen, 78 Wyo. 359, 326 P.2d 1108,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1958).

Exclusion of instrument. —

It is not an abuse of discretion by the court to exclude an instrument not transmitted as one of the papers in the case or as evidence produced before the board. Baker v. Brown, 12 Wyo. 198, 74 P. 94,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1903).

Cited

in

Spaugh v. Ross, 37 Wyo. 396, 263 P. 613,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1928).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

§ 36-2-209.
Notice of perfected appeal; proof of service.

Upon the approval of the bond as aforesaid, the clerk of the district court shall immediately issue a notice to the director and to said appellees and each of them that said appeal has been perfected; such notice may be served personally upon the appellees or their attorneys of record by any appellant or his attorney of record, or by registered mail, by the clerk of the district court. Proof of service may be made by the affidavit of the person making the service and also by the return registry receipt where service is made by registered mail.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 86, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 846; C.S. 1910, § 659; C.S. 1920, § 756; R.S. 1931, § 91-309; C.S. 1945, § 24-309; W.S. 1957, § 36-30; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Cited

in

Spaugh v. Ross, 37 Wyo. 396, 263 P. 613,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1928).

§ 36-2-210.
Hearing and trial upon appeal; appeal to supreme court.

At the expiration of the time for the appearance of the appellees, the case is to be deemed ready for hearing; and it shall be heard and tried the same in all respects as civil cases are tried in said district court; and an appeal from the judgment, finding and decree of said court shall lie to the supreme court the same in all respects as prescribed by law for appeals and proceedings in error from the district courts to the supreme court of this state.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 86, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 847; C.S. 1910, § 660; C.S. 1920, § 757; R.S. 1931, § 91-310; C.S. 1945, § 24-310; W.S. 1957, § 36-31.

Nature of district court's judgment. —

The jurisdiction of the district court on the appeal is to try the case de novo on the facts, and its judgment is not one of affirmance, reversal or modification as upon review upon error, but is based upon its finding upon the evidence and is not governed by the findings of the board. Bucknum v. Johnson, 21 Wyo. 26, 127 P. 904,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1912).

Affirmance properly included on appeal. —

In contest of lease of state lands granted by board, express affirmance of board's decision was properly included in judgment on appeal. Miller v. Hurley, 37 Wyo. 344, 262 P. 238,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1927).

Cited

in

Spaugh v. Ross, 37 Wyo. 396, 263 P. 613,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1928); Brown v. Wintermute, 59 Wyo. 254, 139 P.2d 435,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1943).